Washington statutes.
RCW 35.62.060

Results—Certification.

Whenever any city or town has changed its name, the clerk shall certify the new name to the secretary of state prior to the date when the change takes effect.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.62.060. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 146 s 6; RRS s 8891-6.]